Missouri, session 2026, HB1876.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 170.025, to read as follows:
170.025. 1. Each school district and charter school shall ensure that:
(1) Each elementary school under the control of such school district or charter
school provides instruction in cursive writing so that students create readable
documents through legible cursive handwriting by the end of the fifth grade; and
(2) Each student passes with proficiency a teacher-constructed test
demonstrating competency in both reading and writing cursive.
2. The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1876 2
and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid
and void.
✔